District of Columbia statutes.
20-914

Execution and levy prohibited.

No execution shall issue upon nor shall any levy be made against any property of the estate under any judgment against a decedent or a personal representative. No claim (which is not by its terms secured) shall attach to any particular estate asset, real or personal, whether in the hands of the personal representative or of any bona fide purchaser, or to the proceeds from the sale of any such asset. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prevent the enforcement of mortgages, deeds of trust, pledges, liens, or other security interests upon property in an appropriate proceeding.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(lll), 42 DCR 63

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-914.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-905.